Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6013
Risk-based capital report, defined.

Risk-based capital report means the report required in section 44-6015.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 18.